Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COLUMBUS; HORNSBY STREET NORTHEAST.new text end new text begin $762,000 is appropriated in fiscal year 2026 from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Columbus for improvements to Hornsby Street Northeast from marked Trunk Highway 97 to Eureka Avenue. Improvements include predesign; design; construction; replacement or repair and installation of stormwater improvements; street reconstruction, including improvements on roads adjacent to the project locations; and other improvements or upgrades related to street work. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end